Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5914.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 45-15-11 and 45-15-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-15
entitled "Actions by and Against Towns" are hereby amended to read as follows:
45-15-11. Effect of mending of highway by town.
No work done by any city or town, upon any way or street, in mending or repairing the
way or street, shall constitute or be any evidence of an acceptance of the way or street by the city
or town, nor shall it in any way change the status of the way or street; and the mending or repairing
of the way or street, and any subsequent remedial measures taken that would have made an earlier
injury or harm less likely to occur, shall in no way render the city or town liable to pay
compensation or damages by reason of injuries suffered by any person or persons traveling upon
the way or street, and evidence of the subsequent measures shall not be admissible to prove
negligence, culpable conduct, a defect in the product or design, or a need for a warning or
instruction.
45-15-12. Maximum recovery for personal injuries.
(a) No Notwithstanding §§ 9-31-2 and 9-31-3, no person shall recover from any town in
any action mentioned in §§ 45-15-8 and 45-15-9, a greater sum for personal injuries than one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) three thousand dollars ($3,000).
(b) This section shall be given retroactive effect and apply to all causes of action arising on
or after May 4, 1984 January 1, 2025.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001959
========
LC001959 - Page 2 of 3